Hawaii statutes.
[§658F-5] Personal jurisdiction. (a)
A foreign-country judgment may not be refused recognition for lack of personal
jurisdiction if:

(1) The defendant was served with process personally
in the foreign country;

(2) The defendant voluntarily appeared in the
proceeding, other than for the purpose of protecting property seized or
threatened with seizure in the proceeding or of contesting the jurisdiction of
the court over the defendant;

(3) The defendant, before the commencement of the
proceeding, had agreed to submit to the jurisdiction of the foreign court with
respect to the subject matter involved;

(4) The defendant was domiciled in the foreign
country when the proceeding was instituted or was a corporation or other form
of business organization that had its principal place of business in, or was
organized under the laws of, the foreign country;

(5) The defendant had a business office in the
foreign country and the proceeding in the foreign
court involved a cause of action arising
out of business done by the defendant through that office in the foreign
country; or

(6) The defendant operated a motor vehicle or
airplane in the foreign country and the proceeding involved a cause of action arising out of that operation.

(b) The list of bases for personal
jurisdiction in subsection (a) is not exclusive. The courts of this State may
recognize bases of personal jurisdiction other than those listed in subsection
(a) as sufficient to support a foreign-country judgment. [L 2009, c 34, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next